Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.630

Nominating petition—Requirements.

A nominating petition submitted under this chapter shall clearly identify the name of the minor party or independent candidate convention as it appears on the certificate of nomination as required by *RCW 29A.20.161(3). The petition shall also contain a statement that the person signing the petition is a registered voter of the state of Washington and shall have a space for the voter to sign his or her name and to print his or her name and address. No person may sign more than one nominating petition under this chapter for an office for an election.

[ 2004 c 271 s 112. Formerly RCW 29A.20.151.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 29A.20.161 was recodified as RCW 29A.56.640 pursuant to 2013 c 11 s 93.